lib/ascii-allcaps.xfst
! ascii-allcaps.xfst 
!
! Copyright (c) 2011-2016 Çağrı Çöltekin <cagri@coltekin.net>
! This file is part of TRmorph, released under the terms of 
! the MIT License. See the file LICENSE  or 
! <https://opensource.org/licenses/MIT> for details.
!
! This transducer optionally converts the given 
! ASCII string to 

define Capitalize @"ascii-capitalize.fst";
define ASCIIupper @"ascii-upper.fst";

regex Capitalize .o.
        a (->) A, b (->) B, c (->) C, d (->) D, 
        e (->) E, f (->) F, g (->) G, h (->) H, i (->) I, 
        j (->) J, k (->) K, l (->) L, m (->) M, n (->) N, o (->) O,
        p (->) P, r (->) R, s (->) S, t (->) T, q (->) Q, u (->) U,
        v (->) V, w (->) W, x (->) X, y (->) Y, z (->) Z
        // ASCIIupper  _ 
    .o. a -> A, b -> B, c -> C, d -> D,
        e -> E, f -> F, g -> G, h -> H, i -> I,
        j -> J, k -> K, l -> L, m -> M, n -> N, o -> O,
        p -> P, r -> R, s -> S, t -> T, q -> Q, u -> U,
        v -> V, w -> W, x -> X, y -> Y, z -> Z
        // ASCIIupper ASCIIupper _;
